de: Aufpumpmethode: Automatisch; Hydrostatisch; Manuell; Sonstiges
vi: Phương pháp bơm: Số tự động; Hydrostatic; Xe lăn thủ công; Khác
en: Inflation method: Automatic; Hydrostatic; Manual; Other
pl: Metoda nadmuchiwania: Automatyczny; Hydrostatyczna; Ręczny; Inne
da: Inflationsmetode: Automatisk; Hydrostatic; Manuel; Andet
nb: Inflasjonsmetode: Automatisk; Hydrostatisk; Manuell; Annet
ko: 팽창 방식: 자동; 유체정역학; 수동; 기타
pt-PT: Método de inflação: Automático; Hidrostático; Manual; Outro
nl: Methode opblazen: Automatisch; Hydrostatisch; Handmatig; Andere
ru: Система надува: Автоматический; Гидростатический; Ручной; Другой
fr: Méthode de gonflage: Automatique; Hydrostatique; Manuel; Autre
sl-SI: Način napihovanja: Samodejno; Hidrostatična; Ročno; Drugo
sk-SK: Metóda nafukovania: Automatický; Hydrostatický; Manuálny; Iné
el: Μέθοδος φουσκώματος: Αυτόματος; Υδροστατικό; Μη αυτόματος; Άλλο
sv: Inflationsmetod: Automatisk; Hydrostatisk; Manuell; Övrigt
hr-HR: Metoda napuhavanja: Automatsko; Hidrostatsko; Ručno; Ostalo
zh-CN: 充气方法: 自动的; 流体静力; 手动; 其他
it: Metodo di gonfiaggio: Automatico; Idrostatico; Manuale; Altro
zh-TW: 充氣方法: 自動; 流體靜力的; 手動; 其他
fi: Inflaatiomenetelmä: Automaattinen; Hydrostaattinen; Manuaalinen; Muu
cs: Způsob nafukování: Automatický; Hydrostatický; Ruční; Jiné
ja: インフレーション方式: オートマチック; 静水圧; 手動; その他
pt-BR: Método de insuflação: Automática; Hidrostático; Manual; Outro
th: วิธีการสูบลม: อัตโนมัติ; ไฮโดรสแตติก; มือเข็น; อื่นๆ
hu: Felfújás módszere: Automatikus; Hidrosztatikus; Manuális; Egyéb
lt-LT: Pripūtimo būdas: Automatinis; Hidrostatinis; Rankinis; Kita
bg-BG: Начин на надуване: Автоматична; Хидростатичен; Ръчна; Други
tr: Enflasyon yöntemi: Otomatik; Hidrostatik; Manuel; Diğer
es: Método de inflado: Automático; Hidrostático; Manual; Otros
ro-RO: Metodă umflare: Automată; Hidrostatic; Manual; Altele